Florida, session 2026, SB420.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSubsection (4) of section 1003.44, Florida 15 Statutes, is amended to read: 16 1003.44âPatriotic programs; rules.â 17 (4)âEach district school board shall adopt rules to 18 require, in all of the schools of the district and in each 19 building used by the district school board:, 20 (a)âThe display of the state motto, âIn God We Trust,â 21 designated under s. 15.0301, in a conspicuous place at each 22 public school in the district and in each building used by the 23 district school board. 24 (b)âSubject to legislative appropriation, the display of 25 portraits of George Washington and Abraham Lincoln in a 26 conspicuous place at each public school in the district. The 27 Department of Education shall select the portraits and make them 28 available to each school district. 29 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.